Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 45 O.S. 2021, Section 931, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 931. A. All operators of coal mining operations shall
pay to the Department of Mines a fee of seven and one-half cents
($0.075) per ton of coal produced.
B. All operators of noncoal mining operations shall pay to the
Department of Mines a fee of one and one-fourth cents ($0.0125) one
and one-half cents ($0.0150) per ton of mineral produced. For the
purposes of this section, "mineral" shall be defined as provided in
paragraph 4 of Section 723 of this title.
C. The fees imposed by this section shall be paid no later than
thirty (30) days after the end of each calendar quarter beginning
the first calendar quarter after June 30, 1982.
D. The Department shall develop and promulgate a report form,
which shall be as similar as possible to the form required of
operators by federal law, and which shall state the amount of coal
or mineral produced during the calendar quarter, the method of coal

or mineral removal, and the type of coal or mineral. The operator
shall swear to the accuracy of the report before a notary public,
who shall duly notarize the report.
E. All fees collected by the Department of Mines pursuant to
this section shall be deposited with the State Treasurer, who shall
credit one cent ($0.01) per ton of fees collected on coal produced
on or after July 1, 1988, and one-tenth of one cent ($0.001) per ton
of fees collected on minerals produced on or after July 1, 1988, to
the Oklahoma Miner Training Institute Revolving Fund, with the
balance of the fees collected to be deposited in the Department of
Mines Revolving Fund.
F. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B of
this section, each operator subject to the fees imposed by this
section shall pay a minimum annual fee of Five Dollars ($5.00). If
the total amount of fees calculated pursuant to subsections A and B
of this section for a calendar year is less than Five Dollars
($5.00), the operator shall remit an amount sufficient to meet the
minimum annual fee requirement.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4032 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4032 Page 3